Louisiana, session 2026, HB257.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
11 Section 1. R.S. 33:423.31 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
12 §423.31. City of Central; police chief; police personnel
13 Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 33:423, the chief of police of the city
14 of Central may appoint, promote, discipline, and dismiss police personnel without
15 the approval of the mayor or the governing authority of the city.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-343 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 257